Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 8. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 10.15.565.
Failure to approve document.

If the department fails to approve articles of incorporation, amendment, merger, consolidation, or dissolution, or any other document required by this chapter to be approved before the document is filed, the procedure and remedies are those specified in AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) as to business corporations.

History.

(§ 64 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Sec. 10.15.570.
Declaration of public policy that cooperatives are not in restraint of trade.

It is the public policy of the state to encourage the efficient production and distribution of agricultural and other products derived from its natural resources or labor resources.
Accordingly, a cooperative that operates in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and that does not, during its fiscal year, market products for nonmember patrons in an amount greater in value than the products marketed for its members is not a conspiracy or combination in restraint of trade, or an illegal monopoly. The contracts of a cooperative authorized by this chapter, whether or not required by the cooperative as a condition of membership or of doing business with the cooperative, may not be construed as an unlawful restraint of trade, or as part of a conspiracy or combination to accomplish an improper or illegal purpose or act.

History.

(§ 65 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.575.
Use of term “cooperative”.

A person other than a cooperative association incorporated under this chapter or a previous law of the state may not use the term “cooperative,” or any variation of the term, as part of its corporate or other business name or title. However, this section does not apply to cooperatives organized to generate and transmit electric energy and power or to furnish electric or telephone or related telecommunications service.

A cooperative may enjoin a violation of this section upon suit without a showing of damage to itself.

History.

(§ 66 ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (a), added “or related telecommunications” near the end.

Sec. 10.15.578.
Distinguishable name.

The name of a cooperative association must be distinguishable on the records of the department from the name of any other organized entity and from a reserved or registered name. The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement this section. In this section, “organized entity” and “reserved or registered name” have the meanings given in AS

10.35.040

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of this section, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.